California statutes. Education Code
(3) “Local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(4) “Youth behavioral health disorders” means pupil mental health and substance use disorders.

(5) “Youth behavioral health training” means training addressing the signs and symptoms of a pupil mental health or substance use disorder.

(b) The department shall, on or before January 1, 2023, recommend best practices, and identify evidence-based and evidence-informed training programs for schools to address youth behavioral health, including, but not necessarily limited to, staff and pupil training.

(c) In identifying one or more evidence-based or evidence-informed youth behavioral health training programs for use by local educational agencies to train school staff or pupils pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall ensure that each training program meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Provides instruction on recognizing the signs and symptoms of youth behavioral health disorders, including common psychiatric conditions and substance use disorders such as opioid and alcohol abuse.

(2) Provides instruction on how school staff can best provide referrals to youth behavioral health services or other support to individuals in the early stages of developing a youth behavioral health disorder.

(3) Provides instruction on how to maintain pupil privacy and confidentiality in a manner consistent with federal and state privacy laws.

(4) Provides instruction on the safe de-escalation of crisis situations involving individuals with a youth behavioral health disorder.

(5) Is capable of assessing trainee knowledge before and after training is provided in order to measure training outcomes.

(6) Is administered by a nationally recognized training authority in youth behavioral health disorders or by a local educational agency.

(7) (A) Includes in-person and virtual training
 with certified instructors who can recommend resources available in the community for individuals with a youth behavioral health disorder.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “certified instructors” means individuals who obtain or have obtained a certification to provide the selected youth behavioral health training.

(d) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that an appropriation is made in the annual Budget Act or another statute for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 4.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49428.16.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to assist local educational agencies in developing strategies for preventing pupil opioid overdoses, including synthetic opioids.

(b) The Legislature encourages county offices of education to establish a County Working Group on Fentanyl Education in Schools for the purposes of outreach, building awareness, and collaborating with local health agencies regarding fentanyl overdoses. A County Working Group on Fentanyl Education in Schools is encouraged to, at a minimum, include representatives of local educational agencies within the county and the county public health department.

(c) The department shall curate and maintain on its internet
 website all of the following:

(1) Informational materials containing awareness and safety advice, for school staff, pupils, and parents or guardians of pupils, on how to prevent an opioid overdose and any relevant information developed by a County Working Group on Fentanyl Education in Schools established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) Resource information on an entity’s application process for the statewide standing order issued by the State Public Health Officer pursuant to Section 1714.22 of the Civil Code, and resource information on an entity’s participation in the Naloxone Distribution Project administered by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(3) Resource information on the provision of emergency naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist, as described in Section 49414.3.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(2) “Opioid antagonist” means naloxone hydrochloride or another drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration that, when administered, negates or neutralizes in whole or in part the pharmacological effects of an opioid in the body, and has been approved for the treatment of an opioid overdose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 856, Sec. 6.   (SB 10)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49428.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(2) “Youth behavioral health disorders” means pupil mental health and substance use disorders.

(3) “Youth behavioral health training” means training that develops awareness of trauma and the brain’s response to stress and the protective factors for behavioral health and well-being that support healing and
 resilience.

(b) (1) The governing board or body of a local educational agency shall, before January 31, 2026, adopt, at a regularly scheduled meeting, a policy on referral protocols for addressing pupil behavioral health concerns in grades 7 to 12, inclusive. The policy shall be developed in consultation with school and community stakeholders and school-linked behavioral health professionals, and shall, at a minimum, address procedures relating to referrals to behavioral health professionals and support services. Policies adopted before the date of enactment of the act that added this section may be considered to meet the requirements of this section, if they fulfill the requirements of this section.

(2) The policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall either be based
 on the model policy developed by the department or be consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 49428.1.

(3) The policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall specifically address the needs of high-risk groups, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Pupils bereaved by death or loss of a close family member or friend.

(B) Pupils for whom there is concern due to behavioral health disorders, including common psychiatric conditions and substance use disorders such as opioid and alcohol abuse.

(C) Pupils with disabilities, mental illness, or substance use disorders.

(D) Pupils
 experiencing homelessness or placed in out-of-home settings, such as foster care.

(E) Lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, or questioning pupils.

(4) (A) The policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall also address any training to be provided to teachers of pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, on pupil behavioral health.

(B) Materials approved by a local educational agency for training shall include how to identify appropriate contacts for behavioral health evaluation, services, or both evaluation and services, at both the schoolsite and within the larger community, and when and how to refer pupils and their families to those services.

(C) Materials approved for training may also include programs that can be completed through self-review of materials developed pursuant to this section.

(5) The policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be written to ensure that a school employee acts only within the authorization and scope of the employee’s credential or license. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing or encouraging a school employee to diagnose or treat youth behavioral health disorders unless the employee is specifically licensed and employed to do so.

(6) To assist local educational agencies in developing policies on referral protocols, the department shall develop and maintain a model policy in accordance with Section 49428.1 to serve as a guide for local educational
 agencies.

(c) Subject to subdivision (d), on or before July 1, 2029, a local educational agency shall certify to the department that 100 percent of its certificated employees and 40 percent of its classified employees, who have direct contact with pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, have received youth behavioral health training at least one time, in accordance with all of the following:

(1) The training provides instruction around the unique risk factors and warning signs of behavioral health problems in adolescents, builds understanding of the importance of early intervention, and teaches classified and certificated employees how to help an adolescent in crisis or experiencing a behavioral health challenge, including guidance on when to make referrals consistent with the policy
 adopted pursuant to subdivision (b). The training may also include the following:

(A) Instruction on recognizing the signs and symptoms of youth behavioral health disorders, including, but not limited to, psychiatric conditions and substance use disorders such as opioid and alcohol abuse.

(B) Instruction on how to maintain pupil privacy and confidentiality in a manner consistent with federal and state privacy laws.

(C) Instruction on the safe de-escalation of crisis situations involving pupils with a youth behavioral health disorder.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the youth behavioral health training is provided to classified and certificated
 employees during regularly scheduled work hours.

(3) If a classified or certificated employee receives the youth behavioral health training in a manner other than through an in-service training program provided by the local educational agency, the employee may present a certificate of successful completion of the training to the local educational agency for purposes of satisfying the requirements of this subdivision.

(4) The youth behavioral health training shall not be a condition of employment or hiring for classified or certificated employees.

(5) A local educational agency may use the training described in subdivision (c) of Section 49428.15 to meet the requirements of this section.

(d) A local educational agency may exclude a licensed behavioral health professional who holds a pupil personnel services credential from the youth behavioral health training required by this section.

(e) A local educational agency may meet the requirements of subdivision (c) through an alternative approach by adopting a policy that describes how this approach is consistent with the goals specified in subdivision (c) but better meets the needs of pupils.

(f) Any parts of this section that fall within the scope of representation, as that term is used in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3543.2 of the Government Code, are subject to bargaining with the exclusive representative pursuant to Chapter 10.7
 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000), or as much of that amount as is available, be allocated to the department, for apportionments to local educational agencies in the 2025–26 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 36005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Upon appropriation for this purpose, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The funding shall be provided on a per-pupil basis for each pupil enrolled in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, as reported in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System for the prior year Fall 1 Submission to meet the requirements of this section.

(2) Local educational agencies shall first use the funding provided to support the youth behavioral health training described in subdivision (c).

(3) If there are remaining funds, local educational agencies shall use the funds to offer additional training consistent with this section or to increase the number of staff that hold a pupil personnel services credential within the local educational agency.

(h) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 3.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

49428.5.

(a) On or before the start of the 2023–24 school year, each schoolsite in a school district, county office of education, or charter school, serving pupils in any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive, shall create a poster that identifies approaches and shares resources regarding pupil mental health.

(b) The schoolsite may partner with pupils enrolled at that schoolsite, local, state, or federal agencies, or nonprofit organizations, for purposes of the design and content of the poster.

(c) The language in the poster shall be age appropriate and culturally relevant, and the schoolsite may partner with pupils enrolled at
 that schoolsite, local, state, or federal agencies, or nonprofit organizations, for these purposes.

(d) The poster shall be displayed in English and any primary language spoken by 15 percent or more of the pupils enrolled at the schoolsite as determined pursuant to Section 48985.

(e) The poster shall be no smaller than 8.5 by 11 inches and use at least 12-point font.

(f) The poster shall display, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Identification of common behaviors of those struggling with mental health or who are in a mental health crisis, including, but not limited to, anxiety, depression, eating disorders, emotional dysregulation, bipolar episodes, and
 schizophrenic episodes.

(2) A list of, and contact information for, schoolsite-specific resources, including, but not limited to, counselors, wellness centers, and peer
 counselors.

(3) A list of, and contact information for, community resources, including, but not limited to, suicide prevention, substance abuse, child crisis, nonpolice mental health hotlines, public behavioral health services, and community mental health centers.

(4) A list of positive coping strategies to use when dealing with mental health, including, but not limited to, meditation, mindfulness, yoga, breathing exercises, grounding skills, journaling, acceptance, and seeking therapy.

(5) A list of negative coping strategies to avoid, including, but not limited to, substance abuse or self-medication, violence and abuse, self-harm, compulsivity, dissociation, catastrophizing, and isolating.

(g) (1) (A) Commencing with the 2023–24 school year, the poster shall be prominently and conspicuously displayed in appropriate public areas that are accessible to, and commonly frequented by, pupils at each schoolsite.

(B) The governing board of a school district, governing body of a charter school, and county board of education shall have full discretion to select additional appropriate public areas that are accessible to, and commonly frequented by, pupils to display the poster at the schoolsite. These areas may include, but are not limited to, bathrooms, locker rooms, classrooms, classroom hallways, gymnasiums, auditoriums, cafeterias, wellness centers, and offices.

(2) The poster shall be digitized and distributed online to pupils through social media, internet websites, portals, and learning
 platforms at the beginning of each school year.

(3) To assist school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools in developing policies for pupil suicide prevention, the department shall develop and maintain a model poster, in collaboration with mental health experts, pupils, and administrators, in accordance with this section to serve as a guide for school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.

(h) No basis for civil liability is created by this section for any school district, county office of education, or charter school serving pupils in any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 431, Sec. 1.   (AB 748)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49429.

(a) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services and appropriate stakeholders, including stakeholders with experience in telehealth, as defined in subdivision (d), shall develop guidelines on or before December 31, 2022, for the use of telehealth technology in public schools, including charter schools, to provide mental health and behavioral health services to pupils on school campuses.

(b) The guidelines developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but are not limited to, guidance on all of the following:

(1) Qualifications of individuals authorized to provide assistance, within their scope of practice, to pupils in accessing mental health and behavioral
 health services via telehealth technology at a schoolsite.

(2) Qualifications of individuals authorized to provide mental health and behavioral health services, within their scope of practice, to pupils via telehealth technology.

(3) Potential sources of funding for the purchase of the necessary equipment and technology infrastructure by schools to allow schools to provide telehealth services.

(4) The ability of mental and behavioral health services providers to access reimbursement through the Medi-Cal program or other sources for services provided to pupils at schoolsites via telehealth technology.

(5) The legal requirements for parental consent for the provision of mental health and behavioral health treatment of minors via telehealth technology.

(6) Measures necessary to protect the security of data transmitted via telehealth technology.

(7) Measures necessary to protect the privacy of pupil data pursuant to the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and medical records pursuant to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191).

(8) Potential school district, county office of education, and charter school liability associated with the provision of telehealth services.

(c) The department shall post the guidelines developed pursuant to this section on its internet website on or before December 31, 2022.

(d) For purposes of this section, “telehealth”
 means the mode of delivering health care services via information and communication technologies to facilitate the diagnosis, consultation, treatment, education, care management, and self-management of a pupil’s health care while the pupil is at a schoolsite and the health care provider is at a distant site.

(e) This section shall only be implemented if sufficient funds are made available to the department pursuant to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or another statute for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 252, Sec. 25.   (AB 167)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

49429.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school. 

(b) On or before November 1, 2024, county offices of education, in consultation with the department and other relevant state and local agencies, shall coordinate agreements between school districts and charter schools within the county in order to develop a system through which qualified mental health professionals and other key school personnel employed by individual school districts and charter schools throughout the county could be rapidly deployed on a short- or long-term basis to an area of the county that has experienced a
 natural disaster or other traumatic event, in order to provide support to pupils and staff, to the extent the school district or charter school employing those professionals or personnel determines they can be deployed under the circumstances. In developing agreements for this system of sharing mental health professionals and other key school personnel, county offices of education shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The cost of creating and maintaining the system described in this subdivision.

(2) The criteria required for a local educational agency to request the use of mental health professionals and
 other key school personnel employed by another local educational agency.

(3) Potential reimbursement between local educational agencies.

(4) Reimbursement for travel expenses incurred by mental health professionals and other key school personnel.

(c) Single school district county offices of education shall comply with subdivision (b) by entering into agreements with at least one other county office of education they share a border with.

(d) County offices of education that share a county border with a single school district county office of education shall consult with and enter into agreements with at least one single school district county office of education in
 order to comply with subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 909, Sec. 2.   (AB 2072)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. The Pupil Nutrition, Health, and Achievement Act of 2001 [49430. - 49434.]

49430.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Added sweetener” means an additive other than 100 percent fruit juice that enhances the sweetness of a beverage.

(b) “Combination foods” means products that contain two or more components representing two or more of the recommended food groups: fruit, vegetable, dairy, protein, or grains.

(c) “Competitive foods” means all food and beverages other than meals reimbursed under programs authorized by the federal Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act (Public Law 113-79) and the federal Child Nutrition Act of
 1966 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1771 et seq.) available for sale to pupils on the school campus during the schoolday.

(d) “Deep fried” means a food item that is cooked by total submersion in oil or fat.

(e) “Elementary school” means a school operated and maintained by a school district or county office of education that maintains any grade from kindergarten to grade 6, inclusive, but no grade higher than grade 6.

(f) “Entrée” means a food that is generally regarded as being the primary food in a meal, and shall include, but not be limited to, sandwiches, burritos, pasta, and pizza.

(g) “Flash fried” means a food item that is quickly fried on both sides in oil with
 a temperature of 400 degrees Fahrenheit or higher.

(h) “High school” means a school operated and maintained by a school district or county office of education maintaining any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(i) “Middle school” means a school operated and maintained by a school district or county office of education that maintains grade 7 or 8, grades 7 to 9, inclusive, or grades 7 to 10, inclusive.

(j) “Par fried” means a food item that is fried to reach an internal temperature of 160 degrees Fahrenheit then it is cooled to room temperature so that it may be refrigerated or frozen for future frying.

(k) “School campus” means all areas of the property under the jurisdiction
 of the school that are accessible to pupils during the schoolday.

(l) “Schoolday” means the period from the midnight before to 30 minutes after the end of the official schoolday.

(m) “Snack” means a food that is generally regarded as supplementing a meal, including, but not limited to, chips, crackers, yogurt, cheese, nuts, seeds, fruit, or vegetables.

(n) “Sold” means the exchange of food or beverages for money, coupons, vouchers, or order forms when any part of the exchange occurs on a school campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 280, Sec. 2.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

49430.3.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law, including, but not limited to, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 38080) of Part 23 or Section 48931, this article shall control over contrary provisions relating to the sale of food items to public school pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 913, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

49430.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Child development program” means a program operated pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(2) “School” means a school operated and maintained by a school district or county office of education, or a charter school.

(3) “School district” means a school district, charter school, or county office of education.

(b) As a condition of receipt of state meal reimbursement funds pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 49530), for meals
 and food items sold as part of the free and reduced-price meal programs, a school or school district shall comply with all of the following requirements and prohibitions:

(1) Follow the United States Department of Agriculture meal pattern.

(2) Not sell or serve a food item that has in any way been deep fried, par fried, or flash fried by a school or school district.

(3) Not sell or serve a food item containing artificial trans fat. A food item contains artificial trans fat if it contains vegetable shortening, margarine, or any kind of hydrogenated or partially hydrogenated vegetable oil, unless the manufacturer’s documentation or the label required on the food, pursuant to applicable federal and state law, lists the trans fat content as less than 0.5 grams per serving.

(4) Not sell or serve a food item that, as part of the manufacturing process, has been deep fried, par fried, or flash fried in an oil or fat that is prohibited by this paragraph. Oils and fats prohibited by this paragraph include, but are not limited to, palm, coconut, palm kernel, and lard, typically solid at room temperature and are known to negatively impact cardiovascular health. Oils permitted by this paragraph include, but are not limited to, canola, safflower, sunflower, corn, olive, soybean, peanut, or a blend of these oils, typically liquid at room temperature and are known for their positive cardiovascular benefit.

(c) For meals and food items sold as part of the free and reduced-price meal programs, a child development program is encouraged to comply with all of the following guidelines:

(1) Meet
 developmentally and programmatically appropriate meal pattern and the United States Department of Agriculture meal pattern.

(2) Not sell or serve a food item that has in any way been deep fried, par fried, or flash fried by a school, school district, or child development program.

(3) Not sell or serve a food item containing artificial trans fat. A food item contains artificial trans fat if it contains vegetable shortening, margarine, or any kind of hydrogenated or partially hydrogenated vegetable oil, unless the manufacturer’s documentation or the label required on the food, pursuant to applicable federal and state law, lists the trans fat content as less than 0.5 grams per serving.

(4) Not sell or serve a food item that, as part of the manufacturing process, has been deep fried, par fried, or flash fried in an oil
 or fat prohibited by this paragraph. Oils and fats prohibited by this paragraph include, but are not limited to, palm, coconut, palm kernel, and lard, typically solid at room temperature and are known to negatively impact cardiovascular health. Oils permitted by this provision include, but are not limited to, canola, safflower, sunflower, corn, olive, soybean, peanut, or a blend of these oils, typically liquid at room temperature and are known for their positive cardiovascular benefit.

(d) As a condition of receipt of funds pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 49530), schools and school districts shall provide the department with an annual certification of compliance with this section.

(e) This section shall become operative only upon an appropriation for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 43.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

49431.

(a) From the midnight before to 30 minutes after the end of the official schoolday, at each elementary school, the only competitive foods that may be sold to a pupil are fruit, vegetable, dairy, protein, or whole grain rich food items; foods with a fruit, vegetable, dairy, protein, or whole grain item as its first ingredient; or combination foods containing at least one-quarter cup of fruit or vegetable that meets the following standards:

(1) Not more than 35 percent of its total calories shall be from fat. This paragraph shall not apply to individually sold portions of nuts, nut butters, seeds, seed butters, reduced-fat cheese or part-skim mozzarella cheese packaged for individual sale, eggs, fruits, vegetables that have not been deep fried, seafood, or a dried
 fruit and nut and seed combination.

(2) Less than 10 percent of its total calories shall be from saturated fat. This paragraph shall not apply to reduced-fat cheese or part-skim mozzarella cheese packaged for individual sale, eggs, nuts, nut butters, seeds, seed butters, or a dried fruit and nut and seed combination.

(3) Not more than 35 percent of its total weight shall be composed of sugar, including naturally occurring and added sugar. This paragraph shall not apply to fruits, vegetables that have not been deep fried, or a dried fruit and nut and seed combination.

(4) Contains less than 0.5 grams of trans fat per serving.

(5) Contains not more than 200 milligrams of sodium per item, package, or container sold to a pupil.

(6) Contains not more than 200 calories per individual food item.

(7) Beginning December 31, 2027, competitive foods do not contain any of the following substances:

(A) Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).

(B) Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0).

(C) Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).

(D) Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).

(E) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).

(F) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).

(8) Beginning July 1, 2035, federal National School Lunch Program and federal School Breakfast Program
 food and competitive entrées sold by any entity, excluding foods provided by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) Foods in Schools program, do not include either of the following:

(A) Restricted school foods, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Ultraprocessed foods of concern, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) An elementary school may permit the sale of food items that do not comply with subdivision (a) as part of a school fundraising event in either of the following circumstances:

(1) The sale of those items takes place off of and away from school premises.

(2) The sale of those items takes place on
 school premises at least one-half hour after the end of the schoolday.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the governing board of a school district annually review its compliance with the nutrition standards described in this section and Section 49431.5.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a school from selling to a pupil, after the pupil has been provided a school meal pursuant to Section 49501.5, the entrée from an additional nutritiously adequate meal that qualifies for federal reimbursement, from the same meal service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 467, Sec. 3.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49431.2.

(a) From the midnight before to 30 minutes after the end of the official schoolday, at each middle school or high school, the only competitive snack foods that may be sold to a pupil are fruit, vegetable, dairy, protein, or whole grain rich food items; foods with a fruit, vegetable, dairy, protein, or whole grain item as its first ingredient; or combination foods containing at least one-quarter cup of fruit or vegetable that meet all of the following standards:

(1) Not more than 35 percent of its total calories shall be from fat. This paragraph does not apply to the sale of nuts, nut butters, seeds, seed butters, reduced-fat cheese or part-skim mozzarella cheese packaged for individual sale, eggs, fruits, vegetables that have not been deep fried, seafood, or a
 dried fruit and nut and seed combination.

(2) Less than 10 percent of its total calories shall be from saturated fat. This paragraph shall not apply to reduced-fat cheese or part-skim mozzarella cheese packaged for individual sale, eggs, nuts, nut butters, seeds, seed butters, or a dried fruit and nut and seed combination.

(3) Not more than 35 percent of its total weight shall be composed of sugar, including naturally occurring and added sugars. This paragraph shall not apply to the sale of fruits, vegetables that have not been deep fried, or a dried fruit and nut and seed combination.

(4) Contains less than 0.5 grams of trans fat per serving.

(5) Contains not more than 200 milligrams of sodium per item, package, or container sold to a pupil.

(6) Contains not more than 200 calories per individual food item.

(7) Beginning December 31, 2027, competitive foods do not contain any of the following substances:

(A) Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).

(B) Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0).

(C) Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).

(D) Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).

(E) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).

(F) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).

(8) Beginning July 1, 2035, competitive foods do not include either of the following:

(A) Restricted school foods, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Ultraprocessed foods of concern, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) From the midnight before to 30 minutes after the end of the official schoolday, at each middle school or high school, a competitive entrée sold by the district food service department the day, or the day after, it is served on the federal National School Lunch Program or federal School Breakfast Program menu shall meet the following standards:

(A) Contains not more than 400 calories per entrée item.

(B) Not more than 35 percent of its total calories shall be from
 fat.

(C) Contains less than 0.5 grams trans fat per serving.

(D) Is offered in the same or smaller portion sizes as in the federal National School Lunch Program or federal School Breakfast Program.

(E) Beginning December 31, 2027, federal National School Lunch Program and federal School Breakfast Program entrées, excluding foods provided by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) Foods in Schools program, do not contain any of the following substances:

(i) Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).

(ii) Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0).

(iii) Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).

(iv) Red 40
 (CAS 25956-17-6).

(v) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).

(vi) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).

(F) Beginning July 1, 2035, federal National School Lunch Program and federal School Breakfast Program entrées, excluding foods provided by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) Foods in Schools program, do not include either of the following:

(i) Restricted school foods, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) Ultraprocessed foods of concern, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) From the midnight before to 30 minutes after the end of the official schoolday, at each
 middle school or high school, a competitive entrée sold by the district food service department but not the day, or the day after, it is served on the federal National School Lunch Program or federal School Breakfast Program menu, or a competitive entrée sold by any other entity, shall meet the following standards:

(A) Not more than 35 percent of its total calories shall be from fat.

(B) Less than 10 percent of its calories shall be from saturated fat.

(C) Not more than 35 percent of its total weight shall be composed of sugar, including naturally occurring and added sugar.

(D) Contains less than 0.5 grams of trans fat per serving.

(E) Contains not more than 480 milligrams of sodium.

(F) Contains not more than 350 calories.

(G) Beginning December 31, 2027, federal National School Lunch Program and federal School Breakfast Program entrées and competitive entrées sold by any entity, excluding foods provided by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) Foods in Schools program, do not contain any of the following substances:

(i) Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).

(ii) Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0).

(iii) Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).

(iv) Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).

(v) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).

(vi) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).

(H) Beginning July 1, 2035, federal National School Lunch Program and federal School Breakfast Program entrées and competitive entrées sold by any entity, excluding foods provided by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) Foods in Schools program, do not include either of the following:

(i) Restricted school foods, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) Ultraprocessed foods of concern, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) A middle school or high school may permit the sale of food items that do not comply with subdivision (a) or (b) in any of the following circumstances:

(1) The sale of those items takes place off of and away from school premises.

(2) The sale of those items takes place on school premises at least one-half hour after the end of the schoolday.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the governing board of a school district annually review its compliance with the nutrition standards described in this section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a school from selling to a pupil, after the pupil has been provided a school meal pursuant to Section 49501.5, the entrée from an additional nutritiously adequate meal that qualifies for federal reimbursement, from the same meal service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 467, Sec. 4.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49431.5.

(a) (1) (A) From the midnight before to 30 minutes after the end of the official schoolday, at each elementary or middle school, the only competitive beverages that may be sold to a pupil are the following:

(i) Fruit-based drinks that are composed of no less than 50 percent fruit juice and have no added sweetener in a maximum serving size of 8 fluid ounces for elementary school or 12 fluid ounces for middle school.

(ii) Vegetable-based drinks that are composed of no less than 50 percent vegetable juice and have no added sweetener in a maximum serving size of 8 fluid ounces for elementary school or 12 fluid ounces for middle school.

(iii) Plain water or plain carbonated water.

(iv) One-percent-fat unflavored milk, nonfat flavored or unflavored milk, soy milk, rice milk, almond milk, and other similar nondairy milk in a maximum serving size of 8 fluid ounces for elementary school or 12 fluid ounces for middle school.

(B) A beverage shall not contain any of the following:

(i) Caffeine, with the exception of trace amounts of naturally occurring caffeine substances.

(ii) Beginning December 31, 2027, any of the following substances:

(I) Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).

(II) Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0).

(III) Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).

(IV) Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).

(V) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).

(VI) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).

(iii) Beginning July 1, 2035, either of the following:

(I) Restricted school foods, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.
